Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202179-9,123
Work plan; billing for work; payment.

(1) The administrator and board of trustees of any Class V school employees retirement system established under the Class V School Employees Retirement Act may quarterly bill the employer of such Class V school employees retirement system for all work performed and expenses incurred by the administrator, staff, and any consultants of the Class V school employees retirement system in response to requests for records, documents, data, or other information from the Nebraska Public Employees Retirement Systems or the retirement board in completion of the work plan described in section 79-9,121.

(2)(a) The retirement board may bill an employer of any Class V school employees retirement system monthly for all work performed and expenses incurred pursuant to section 79-9,124.

(b) The administrator and board of trustees of any Class V school employees retirement system established under the Class V School Employees Retirement Act may bill the employer of such Class V school employees retirement system monthly for all work performed and expenses incurred by the administrator, staff, and any consultants of the Class V school employees retirement system for the transition and transfer of management and general administration of such retirement system to the retirement board as described in section 79-979.01.

(3) An employer of a retirement system shall remit payment pursuant to this section to the board of trustees within forty-five calendar days after receipt of each monthly bill and to the retirement board within the time period and in the manner negotiated in the transition and transfer of management and administration plan entered into pursuant to section 79-979.01.

Laws 2019, LB31, § 5;

Laws 2021, LB147, § 42.